Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 30

Career and Technical Education

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 176, § 9, provided:

“COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEM OF PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT. Section 101(a)(7) of the Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992, commonly referred to as the Comprehensive System of Personnel Development (CSPD), requires State Vocational Rehabilitation (VR) agencies to establish qualified personnel standards for rehabilitation personnel, including VR counselors, that are consistent with any national or State-approved or recognized certification, licensing, or registration that apply to a particular profession. In order to comply with the Rehabilitation Act and its State Plan requirements, there is hereby authorized for the Department of Career Education-Arkansas Rehabilitation Services a general waiver of the Financial Management Guide, R1-19-4-522 Continuing Professional Education. This waiver allows the agency to provide college level coursework in degree programs for any eligible employees selected by the agency. This provision covers any and all formula and discretionary grants funded by the U.S.D.O.E. Rehabilitation Services Administration, now or in the future, including, but not limited to, the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, Supported Employment, Independent Living, and the Staff Development Grant. The waiver applies to federal financial participation (FFP), state general revenue share, and program income.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015.”

Subchapter 1

— Career Education and Workforce Development

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 787, § 5, provided:

“(a)This act shall not be construed as impairing the continued effectiveness of any rules or orders promulgated or issued by the Department of Workforce Education or the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities before the effective date of this act.

“(b)This act shall not be construed as extinguishing or otherwise affecting the unexpired terms of any current members of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities.”

Acts 2015, No. 892, § 1, provided:

“Findings.

“(1)Occupational, technical, and industrial training provides unique opportunities to improve the lives of Arkansans while advancing the state's economic development;

“(2)Businesses seeking to begin operations in Arkansas look to the level of education and skills in the workforce as a key factor in makinginvestment decisions;

“(3)Currently, Arkansas workforce education proceeds in a variety of agencies, without coordination, often with significant inefficiencies arising from overlapping and repeated programming and from important programs being overlooked as presumably covered by another program; and

“(4)Bringing coordination of all state and federal career education and workforce development programs will:

“(A)Reduce duplication of programming;

“(B)Ensure that every Arkansan who seeks occupational, technical, and industrial training will find an appropriate education program in this state;

“(C)Bring consistency and efficiency to the state's career education and workforce development efforts; and

“(D)Alert industry to the commitment of the State of Arkansas to economic development through career education and workforce education.”

Acts 2015, No. 892, § 7, provided:

“(a)The Governor shall call the first meeting of the Career Education and Workforce Development Board within ninety (90) days after the appointment of the industry members.

“(b)The Governor shall appoint a voting member as chair of the board to serve a one-year term.”

Acts 2015, No. 920, §§ 1-3, provided:

“SECTION 1.Legislative intent.

“The purpose of this act is to identify administrative and legislative action that can be used to encourage professionals of necessity to reside and work in every Arkansas community, especially those that are underprivileged and underserved.”

“SECTION 2.Definitions.

“As used in this act:

“(1)‘Professional board’ means a board, agency, committee, commission, department, office, or other authority of the Arkansas state government that is charged with the duty, power, or responsibility to license, register, certify, or otherwise permit the practice of professionals to work in a designated field; and

“(2)‘Professional of necessity’ means a professional who:

“(A)Renders specialized services;

“(B)Has specialized knowledge or skill in a degreed field of study; or

“(C)Has derived specialized knowledge or skill from formal education or research.”

“SECTION 3.Duties of the Department of Workforce Services.

“(a)The Department of Workforce Services shall conduct meetings with or gather information from the various professional boards to achieve the following:

“(1)Identify the communities of this state that are underserved by professionals of necessity;

“(2)Assess the need for professionals of necessity to reside and work in underprivileged and underserved Arkansas communities;

“(3)Explore strategies to encourage professionals of necessity to live and work in underprivileged and underserved Arkansas communities; and

“(4)Recommend administrative and legislative action that may be taken to encourage professionals of necessity to live and work in underprivileged and underserved Arkansas communities.

“(b)No later than November 15, 2016, the Department of Workforce Services shall report its findings under subsection (a) of this section to the:

“(1)House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs;

“(2)House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development;

“(3)President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

“(4)Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(c)Upon request, a professional board shall cooperate and assist the Department of Workforce Services in furtherance of this act.”

Acts 2019, No. 1079, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Occupational, technical, and industrial training provides unique opportunities to improve the lives of Arkansans while advancing the state's economic development;

“(2)Businesses seeking to begin operations in Arkansas look to the level of education and skills in the workforce as a key factor in making investment decisions;

“(3)Currently, Arkansas workforce education operates within a variety of agencies, without coordination, often with significant inefficiencies arising from overlapping and repeated programming and from important programs being overlooked as presumably covered by another program; and

“(4)Bringing coordination of all state and federal career education and workforce development programs will:

“(A)Reduce unnecessary duplication of programming;

“(B)Ensure that every Arkansan who seeks occupational, technical, and industrial training will find an appropriate education program in the state;

“(C)Bring consistency, efficiency, and rigor, as established by applicable industry and accreditation standards to the state's career education and workforce development efforts; and

“(D)Alert industry to the commitment of the State of Arkansas to economic development through career workforce education”.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 2015, No. 892, § 5 added “and Workforce Development” to the subchapter heading.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, No. 787, § 7: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act renames the Department of Workforce Education and the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities and that the ideal time to implement these name changes is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2015, No. 892, § 8: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas workforce education operates within a variety of agencies without coordination, often with significant inefficiencies arising from overlapping and repeated programming; that this act will bring workforce education programs together under a single umbrella agency; and that this act is immediately necessary because the effectiveness of this act is essential to the operation of the programs for which appropriations will be provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 1079, § 4: Apr. 17, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas workforce education operates within a variety of agencies without coordination, often with significant inefficiencies arising from overlapping and repeated programming; that this act will bring workforce education programs together under a single umbrella agency and uniform access to information; and that this act is immediately necessary because the effectiveness of this act is essential to the operation of the programs for which appropriations will be provided. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

25-30-101. Career Education and Workforce Development Board — Creation — Membership.

The Career Education and Workforce Development Board is created.

The board shall consist of the following members, to be appointed by the Governor with advice and consent of the Senate:

As voting members, from a list of recommendations by industry and business associations:

One (1) member to represent the agriculture industry;

One (1) member to represent the construction industry;

One (1) member to represent the energy industry;

One (1) member to represent the healthcare industry;

One (1) member to represent the information technology industry;

One (1) member to represent the manufacturing industry;

One (1) member to represent the financial services industry;

One (1) member to represent the hospitality industry;

One (1) member to represent the transportation-logistics industry;

One (1) member to represent the rehabilitation services industry; and

At the discretion of the Governor, up to three (3) members representing industries not represented in subdivisions (b)(1)(A)(i)-(x) of this section.

A voting member under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section may establish a subcommittee that includes nonboard members from the voting member's relevant industry in order to discuss and develop the list of recommendations developed by certain individuals as required under § 25-30-102(a)(1)(C) for the strategic plan required under § 25-30-102(a)(1)(A); and

As nonvoting members:

The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education;

The Director of the Division of Higher Education;

The Director of the Arkansas Community Colleges;

The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission;

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services;

One (1) member to represent the four-year state-supported institutions of higher education;

One (1) member to represent the Arkansas Association of Educational Administrators;

One (1) member to represent the Department of Human Services;

One (1) member to represent the Department of Corrections;

One (1) member to represent the Arkansas Economic Developers and Chamber Executives;

The Director of the Division of Career and Technical Education; and

One (1) member to represent the Division of Minority and Women-owned Business Enterprise.

The industry members shall serve three-year terms, except that the initial appointees shall serve staggered terms determined by the Governor so that two (2) members serve a one-year term, three (3) members serve a two-year term, and two (2) members serve a three-year term.

A voting member may not serve more than two (2) consecutive three-year terms.

A majority of the membership of the board shall constitute a quorum.

A majority vote of those members present shall be required for any action of the board.

A vacancy on the board due to death, resignation, removal, or other cause shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the term.

The Governor may remove a voting member of the board before the expiration of his or her term for cause only, after notice and hearing in accordance with §§ 25-17-210 and 25-17-211.

Voting members of the board may receive expense reimbursement and stipends under § 25-16-902.

The board shall elect from its own number a chair and other officers necessary to carry on its business.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 787, § 2, provided:

“State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities renamed State Board of Career Education.

“(a)(1)The State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities, as it is referred to or empowered through the Arkansas Code, is renamed.

“(2)In its place, the State Board of Career Education is established, succeeding to the general powers and responsibilities previously assigned to the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities.

“(3)The Chair of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities shall identify and revise all interagency agreements, financial instruments, funds, and other necessary legal documents in order to effect this change.

“(b)Nothing in this act shall be construed as impairing the powers and authority of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities before the effective date of the name change.

“(c)Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the State Board of Career Education.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “State Board of Career Education” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities” throughout the section; and substituted “Career” for “Workforce” in (m) and (n).

The 2011 amendment substituted “A person may not serve” for “No person may serve” in (e); and, in (f), substituted “A candidate” for “No candidate” and inserted “not” preceding “serve.”

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 369 substituted “four-year state supported institutions of higher education” for “Arkansas Association of Public Universities” in (b)(2)(F).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Commissioner of Education” in (b)(2)(A); substituted “Director of the Division of Higher Education” for “Director of the Department of Higher Education” in (b)(2)(B); substituted “Director of the Arkansas Community Colleges” for “Executive Director of the Arkansas Community Colleges” in (b)(2)(C); and substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (b)(2)(E).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1079 redesignated (b)(1) as (b)(1)(A) and former (b)(1)(A)-(b)(1)(K) as (b)(1)(A)(i)-(b)(1)(A)(xi); added (b)(1)(B); added (b)(2)(H) through (L); and updated an internal reference.

Bring together business leaders, industry leaders, education leaders, state agencies, training providers, and other workforce development stakeholders in order to develop a strategic plan and road map for meeting current and future workforce demands.

The plan required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall:

Assist state agencies in better understanding the changing economy;

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Career Education” in the section heading and throughout the section and for “board” in present (b)(2); deleted former (a); redesignated former (b) as (a)(1) and (2); inserted “at least” in (a)(1); redesignated former (c) as (b)(1) and (2) and former (d) as (c); substituted “all vocational, technical, and occupational education, including without limitation” for “but not be limited to” in (c)(1); inserted present (c)(2) and redesignated and rewrote present (c)(3); and deleted former (e) and (f).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a)(2), deleted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board after consultation with the” preceding “State Board of Education” and substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 1079 rewrote the section.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2001, No. 1288, § 25; 2009, No. 787, § 3; 2011, No. 1122, § 6; 2015, No. 892, § 5; 2019, No. 369, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 623, 624; 2019, No. 1079, § 2.

25-30-102. Powers and duties of Office of Skills Development and Career Education and Workforce Development Board.

The Office of Skills Development and the Career Education and Workforce Development Board, in coordination with the Division of Higher Education, the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, and the Department of Education, shall:

Promote alignment of workforce education, higher education, skills, and training with present and future career opportunities;

Identify the estimated costs associated with implementing the required plan under this section;

Identify potential new revenue streams to fund recommendations that are supplemental to existing education funding sources; and

Identify areas of high unemployment in the state where increased efforts can stimulate job growth and employment attainment.

A preliminary plan and recommendations shall be presented to the Governor, the Senate Committee on Education, and the House Committee on Education by July 2020;

Develop and oversee a comprehensive apprenticeship office that serves as the center point for business, industry, and education leaders that want to establish an earn-to-learn apprenticeship program;

Design and create a website that exhibits all aspects of workforce development education, programs, and employment opportunities in the state, and includes without limitation information and opportunities for students, educators, industry leaders, and employers;

Develop a catalogue of nationally recognized credentials that are widely adopted by the respective industries and related to the applicable programs of instruction at each high school, community college, or technical institute or vocational-technical school;

(A)Report on the status of programs of instruction related to the catalogue of nationally recognized credentials developed under subdivision (a)(4) of this section on an annual basis to the Senate Committee on Education and the House Committee on Education beginning January 1, 2020.

The report required under subdivision (a)(5)(A) of this section shall include without limitation related costs associated with seeking and maintaining identified national credentials;

Establish an asset map to identify all state and federal dollars and programs that are intended for workforce education and training from kindergarten through career levels in order to promote alignment of all resources utilized towards the development of an educated and skilled workforce in this state;

Establish an industry sector-led review of related industry-specific programs that are delivered by two-year institutions of higher education and, if applicable, four-year institutions of higher education that includes without limitation:

Curriculum;

Instruction;

Equipment, tools, and technology utilized in instruction;

Employment outcomes;

Partner engagement; and

Program and instructional alignment with widely accepted industry standards or applicable national credentials referenced under subdivision (a)(4) of this section;

Submit a report on the findings of industry-led reviews conducted under subdivision (a)(7) of this section upon completion to the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education;

Adopt rules to administer the office and the Career Education and Workforce Development Board and the programs developed by the office and the Career Education and Workforce Development Board, including without limitation the creation and election of officers subsequent to the initial chairs;

Oversee the office; and

Address other items relative to the quality and operation of workforce development efforts, opportunities, and programs under this subchapter.

The office and the Career Education and Workforce Development Board shall be industry-driven in membership and duties.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2007, No. 617, § 45; 2015, No. 892, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2388; 2019, No. 1079, § 3.

25-30-103. Adult education funds.

The Career Education and Workforce Development Board and the State Board of Education shall remain the sole state agencies to administer any and all state and federal adult education funds.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2015, No. 892, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 787, 2, provided:

“State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities renamed State Board of Career Education.

“(a)(1)The State Board of Workforce Eduction and Career Opportunities, as it is referred to or empowered through the Arkansas Code, is renamed.

“(2)In its place, the State Board of Career Education is established, succeeding to the general powers and responsibilities previously assigned to the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities.

“(3)The Chair of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities shall identify and revise all interagency agreements, financial instruments, funds, and other necessary legal documents in order to effect this change.

“(b)Nothing in this act shall be construed as impairing the powers and authority of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities before the effective date of the name change.

“(c)Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the State Board of Career Education.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities” in the first sentence; and deleted the former second sentence.

25-30-104. Coordination with State Board of Education and Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

The State Board of Education shall coordinate its activities to ensure that academic, workplace, and technical skills create opportunities for a strong comprehensive education regardless of the student's ultimate career choice.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2015, No. 892, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2389.

A.C.R.C. Notes. See note at §25-30-103.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in the section heading; and deleted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board and the” preceding “State Board of Education” in the text of the section.

25-30-105. Coordination between Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board and Career Education and Workforce Development Board.

The Career Education and Workforce Development Board and the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall coordinate their activities to ensure that secondary and postsecondary career preparation is connected to create opportunities for a strong comprehensive education regardless of the student's ultimate career choice.

In addition, the Career Education and Workforce Development Board and the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall participate in a collaborative planning process annually for the distribution of federal funds for workforce education activities, including vocational-technical education.

The distribution shall be pursuant to written agreement between the Career Education and Workforce Development Board and the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

A.C.R.C. Notes. See note at §25-30-103.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added the subsection designations; and substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities.”

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2015, No. 892, § 5.

25-30-106. Division of Career and Technical Education.

There is created the Division of Career and Technical Education within the Department of Education.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 58; 2009, No. 787, § 4; 2013, No. 1438, § 1; 2015, No. 892, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2390.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 787, § 1, provided:

“Department of Workforce Education renamed Department of Career Education.

“(a)(1)The Department of Workforce Education, as it is referred to or empowered through the Arkansas Code, is renamed.

“(2)In its place, the Department of Career Education is established, succeeding to the general powers and responsibilities previously assigned to the Department of Workforce Education.

“(3)The Director of the Department of Workforce Education shall identify and revise all interagency agreements, financial instruments, funds, and other necessary legal documents in order to effect this change.

“(b)Nothing in this act shall be construed as impairing the powers and authority of the Department of Workforce Education before the effective date of the name change.

“(c)Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Workforce Education may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Career Education.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section heading; substituted “Department of Career Education” for “Department of Workforce Education” in four places; and substituted “State Board of Career Education” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities” in (c).

The 2013 amendment substituted “shall” for “must be a person of” in (g); subdivided part of (g) into (g)(1), (g)(2) and (g)(4); and inserted (g)(3).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a); deleted former (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; added designations (b)(1) and (2); substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Career Education” in (b)(1); and substituted “The Governor” for “The board” in the introductory language of (c).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.